Alaska statutes. Title 46. Water, Air, Energy, and Environmental Conservation.
Article 2. Emission Control Permit Program.

Sec. 46.14.110.
Additional contaminant control measures. [Repealed, § 28 ch 74 SLA 1993.]

Sec. 46.14.120.
Permits for construction, installation, modification, or operation.

Before constructing, installing, modifying, or establishing a stationary source subject to AS

46.14.130(a)

, the owner and operator shall obtain a construction permit under this chapter.

Except when considered to be in compliance with this chapter under AS

46.14.275

or under a regulation adopted under AS

46.14.140(a)(12)

, the owner and operator shall obtain an operating permit under this chapter before operating a stationary source subject to AS

46.14.130(b)

.

A permittee shall comply with the terms and conditions of a permit or a modifying compliance order issued by the department under this chapter or a court order. A person operating under the application shield available under AS

46.14.140(a)(12)

and

46.14.275

, shall comply with the terms and conditions of the pending application and applicable regulations.

The department shall ensure that permits issued, modified, amended, renewed, or revoked and reissued under this chapter comply with all applicable federal, state, and local requirements.

If the federal administrator exempts a stationary source from the requirements of 42 U.S.C. 7661a(a) (Clean Air Act, sec. 502(a)), the commissioner shall consider the factors used by the administrator in reaching that determination and, by regulation, shall issue a similar determination unless public health or air quality effects provide a reasonable basis to regulate the stationary source.

The department may exempt or defer a stationary source from the requirement of AS

46.14.130(b)

to the extent allowed under 40 C.F.R. 70.3(b).

Before constructing, installing, modifying, operating, or establishing a stationary source subject to AS

46.14.130(c)

, the owner or operator shall obtain a minor permit under this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993; am §§ 9 — 12 ch 46 SLA 2003; am §§ 28, 29 ch 99 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For informal and fee review procedures, see 18 AAC 15, art. 5.

For administrative appeal proceedures, see 18 AAC 15, art. 6.

For program administration, see 18 AAC 50, art. 2.

For major stationary source permits, see 18 AAC 50, art. 3.

Sec. 46.14.130.
Stationary sources requiring permits.

The owner and operator shall obtain a construction permit from the department before beginning actual construction of any one of the following:

a new major stationary source;

a major modification;

a project subject to the construction permitting requirements of 42 U.S.C. 7412(i) (Clean Air Act, sec. 112(i)).

Except for the owner and operator of a stationary source exempted under AS

46.14.120(e)

or (f), the owner and operator of a stationary source shall obtain an operating permit from the department for

a major source;

a stationary source that contains an emissions unit subject to federal new source performance standards under 42 U.S.C. 7411 (Clean Air Act, sec. 111) or national emission standards for hazardous air pollutants issued under 42 U.S.C. 7412 (Clean Air Act, sec. 112); or

another stationary source designated by the federal administrator by regulation.

Unless the owner and operator of a stationary source are required to obtain a construction permit under (a) of this section, before constructing, installing, modifying, operating, or establishing a stationary source, the owner and operator shall obtain a minor permit from the department if the stationary source is of a type classified under AS

46.14.020

as having the potential to violate the ambient air quality standards; or

under a finding by the department that public health or air quality effects provide a reasonable basis to regulate the stationary source.

In this section, “major source” has the meaning given in 42 U.S.C. 7661(2).

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993; am §§ 13, 14 ch 46 SLA 2003; am §§ 1, 2 ch 33 SLA 2005; am § 69 ch 56 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For program administration, see 18 AAC 50, art. 2.

For major stationary source permits, see 18 AAC 50, art. 3.

Sec. 46.14.140.
Emission control permit program regulations.

The department shall adopt regulations to address substantive and procedural elements of the emission control permit program established under this chapter that are not addressed in statute, except elements that relate only to the internal management of the department and do not affect the public or govern the way the department deals with the public. The regulations must be reasonable and adequate, and provide flexibility in the operation of a stationary source consistent with 42 U.S.C. 7401 — 7671q (Clean Air Act), as amended, and applicable federal regulations. Except for regulations concerning minor permits required under AS

46.14.130(c)

, the regulations must include

a standard permit application form that meets the requirements of federal regulations adopted under 42 U.S.C. 7661a(b) (Clean Air Act, sec. 502(b));

monitoring, record keeping, and reporting requirements for facilities that are subject to AS

46.14.130(b)

, which must comply with the requirements established for state operating permit programs in 40 C.F.R. 70.6, but which may be modified to take into account this state’s unique conditions;

procedures for preparation and submission of a monitoring, reporting, and quality assurance plan and, if required, a compliance schedule describing how a permitted stationary source will comply with the applicable requirements of this chapter;

procedures for

specifying when permit applications and renewal requests are to be submitted;

specifying the time duration for department review of permit applications;

processing and reviewing an application;

providing public notice, including opportunity for public comment and hearing; and

issuing permits, including procedures for issuing permits for temporary operations or open burn activities;

reasonable standard permit conditions, including conditions for

emission standards and limitations;

monitoring, record keeping, and reporting for facilities subject to AS

46.14.130

;

inspection and entry;

certification of corporate or other business organization reports;

annual certification of compliance;

excess emission or process deviation reporting; and

equipment malfunctions and emergencies;

fees and procedures for collecting fees;

provisions addressing late payment or nonpayment of fees, which may include assessment of penalties and interest or refusal to issue, amend, modify, or renew an air quality control permit;

the duration of permits;

procedures for modifying or amending a permit that provide flexibility in the operation of the stationary source, including procedures to allow changes to a permitted stationary source without requiring a permit modification, consistent with the purposes of this chapter and with 42 U.S.C. 7401 — 7671q (Clean Air Act);

reasonable provisions for renewing, reopening, revoking and reissuing, and terminating a permit consistent with the purposes of this chapter and 42 U.S.C. 7401 — 7671q (Clean Air Act);

provisions allowing for physical or operational limitations that will reduce a stationary source’s emissions to levels below those that would make the stationary source subject to part or all of AS

46.14.120

and

46.14.130

;

provisions authorizing stationary source operation while a permit application is pending, consistent with 42 U.S.C. 7661b(d) (Clean Air Act, sec. 503(d));

provisions for ensuring that compliance with an operating permit issued under this chapter will be considered to be compliance with 42 U.S.C. 7661a (Clean Air Act, sec. 502) and other provisions of state or federal law specifically provided for by the department consistent with 42 U.S.C. 7401 — 7671q (Clean Air Act) and regulations adopted under state and federal law;

provisions allowing for certification of inspectors who evaluate compliance with the terms and conditions of a permit, order, regulation, or other provision of law authorized under this chapter; and

definitions of terms incorporating applicable definitions in 42 U.S.C. 7401 — 7671q (Clean Air Act), as amended, and applicable federal regulations, to the extent that those definitions are not inconsistent with this chapter.

A permit issued under this chapter may not require a person to use

machinery, devices, or equipment of a particular type, from a particular supplier, or produced by a particular manufacturer; or

specific methods, processes, procedures, or designs for the management and operation of a stationary source regulated under this chapter except to the extent that the federal administrator has

adopted a design, equipment work practice, or operational standard under 42 U.S.C. 7412(h), as amended, for the control of a hazardous air pollutant; or

approved an alternative hazardous air pollutant standard under 42 U.S.C. 7412(h)(3), as amended.

The absence of, or the department’s failure to adopt, a regulation under this section does not relieve a person from compliance with a permit issued under this chapter and with other provisions of law, including emission control requirements.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993; am §§ 15, 16 ch 46 SLA 2003; am § 3 ch 33 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For informal and fee review procedures, see 18 AAC 15, art. 5.

For ambient air quality management, see 18 AAC 50, art. 1.

For program administration, see 18 AAC 50, art. 2.

For major stationary source permits, see 18 AAC 50, art. 3.

For user fees, see 18 AAC 50, art. 4.

Sec. 46.14.150.
Time for submission of operating permit applications.

The owner and operator of a stationary source required to have an operating permit under this chapter shall submit the required application and other information required by the department by regulation no later than 12 months after the date on which the stationary source becomes subject to AS

46.14.120(b)

.

The department may accept and begin processing applications filed earlier than the submission date. Applications filed earlier may be given priority for permit issuance.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993; am § 17 ch 46 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For informal and fee review procedures, see 18 AAC 15, art. 5.

For administrative appeal proceedures, see 18 AAC 15, art. 6.

For major stationary source permits, see 18 AAC 50, art. 3.

Sec. 46.14.160.
Completeness determination.

The department shall review every application submitted under this chapter for completeness. To be determined complete, an application must provide the information identified by the department in regulations adopted under AS

46.14.140

and in standard application forms provided by the department under AS

46.14.140

(a)(1) and must be certified true and correct by the owner and operator.

The department shall notify the applicant in writing whether the application is complete. Unless the department notifies the applicant within 60 days of receipt of an application that the application is incomplete, the application is considered to be complete.

If, during the processing of an application after it has been determined or considered to be complete, the department finds that additional information is necessary to evaluate or take action on that application, the information may be requested in writing from the owner and operator. A request for information under this subsection does not render the application incomplete. However, notwithstanding AS

46.14.275

, an owner and operator may be found in violation of this chapter for operating without a valid permit if they fail to provide timely additional information.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993)

Sec. 46.14.170.
Administrative actions regarding permits.

Except as provided in AS

46.14.220

or in regulations adopted under AS

46.14.140(a)(7)

, after receipt of a complete application, and after notice and opportunity for public comment and hearing, the department shall issue or deny

a construction permit within 30 days after the close of the public comment period;

an operating permit, other than a general operating permit or temporary operating permit, within 12 months after receipt of the complete application by the department.

[Repealed, § 82 ch 41 SLA 2009.]

Failure by the department to act within the time limits established in or under (a) or (d) of this section is considered to be a final agency action, but only for the purpose of judicial review to determine whether the court will require that action be taken by the department.

The department shall issue or deny a minor permit under AS

46.14.130(c)

within 30 days after the close of the public comment period or within 30 days after receipt of the complete application by the department if a public comment period is not required under this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993; am §§ 18 — 20 ch 46 SLA 2003; am § 30 ch 99 SLA 2004; am §§ 65, 82 ch 41 SLA 2009)

Revisor’s notes. —

Concerning the reference in former subsection (b) to the approval of the state program, on December 5, 1996, the federal administrator gave final interim approval of the state operating permit program submitted by the Alaska Department of Environmental Conservation. See 61 Federal Register 64463-64475 (December 5, 1996.)

Administrative Code. —

For program administration, see 18 AAC 50, art. 2.

For major stationary source permits, see 18 AAC 50, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, repealed (b); substituted “time limits established in or under (a) or (d)” for “time limits established in or under (a), (b), or (d)” in (c).

Sec. 46.14.180.
Monitoring.

Monitoring by the owner and operator of stack emissions or ambient air quality shall be required by the department only for purposes of demonstrating compliance with applicable permit program requirements. Monitoring requirements must be reasonable and based on test methods, analytical procedures, and statistical conventions approved by the federal administrator or the department or otherwise generally accepted as scientifically competent. Unless otherwise agreed to by the owner and operator and the department,

the department may not require an owner and operator of an emissions unit to monitor emissions or ambient air quality solely for the purpose of scientific investigation or research; and

monitoring activities must be consistent with the applicable emission standards and their permit or permit application requirements.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993; am § 21 ch 46 SLA 2003; am § 70 ch 56 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For program administration, see 18 AAC 50, art. 2.

For major stationary source permits, see 18 AAC 50, art. 3.

Sec. 46.14.190.
Single permit.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, the department shall issue only a single operating permit to a stationary source, regardless of whether the stationary source contains a single emissions unit or multiple emissions units.

The department may, upon request of a stationary source owner or operator, issue more than one permit for the stationary source. Substantive and procedural requirements otherwise applicable to a stationary source remain applicable regardless of whether the stationary source owner and operator apply for one or more permits.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993; am § 22 ch 46 SLA 2003; am § 71 ch 56 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For major stationary source permits, see 18 AAC 50, art. 3.

Sec. 46.14.200.
Review of permit action.

A person who has a private, substantive, legally protected interest under state law that may be adversely affected by the permit action, the owner and operator, or, if a public comment process is required or solicited, a person who participated in the public comment process may request an adjudicatory hearing under the department’s adjudicatory hearing procedures. After the issuance of an adjudicatory hearing decision, a party to the hearing may obtain judicial review of that decision as provided in the Alaska Rules of Appellate Procedure.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993; am § 23 ch 46 SLA 2003)

Sec. 46.14.210.
General operating permits.

After notice and opportunity for public comment and hearing, the department may, unless the permit is disapproved by the federal administrator, establish a general operating permit that would be applicable to more than one stationary source determined by the department to be similar in emissions unit structure. A general operating permit must contain provisions that meet the requirements of this chapter that are applicable to operating permits. A general operating permit issued to a particular person takes effect when the person’s application is determined to be complete unless the department notifies the applicant that the general permit is not applicable to the person’s stationary source.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993; am § 24 ch 46 SLA 2003; am § 72 ch 56 SLA 2005)

Sec. 46.14.211.
General minor permits.

After notice and opportunity for public comment and hearing, the department may establish a general minor permit that would be applicable to more than one stationary source determined by the department to be similar in structure. If authorized by the department, a permit issued under this section may be valid for multiple locations in this state. A general minor permit must contain provisions that meet the requirements of this chapter that are applicable to a minor permit.

History.

(§ 25 ch 46 SLA 2003)

Sec. 46.14.215.
Temporary operations.

For purposes of AS

46.14.130(b)

, the department may issue a single operating permit under AS

46.14.170

, authorizing a stationary source to operate at specific multiple locations in the state for temporary periods of time. A permit described in this section is valid only for the specific locations identified in the application and authorized by the department. The department may not issue a permit under this section unless the permit contains conditions that will ensure compliance with this chapter at each authorized location, including compliance with ambient air quality standards and applicable increment or visibility requirements adopted under this chapter. A permit under this section must require the owner and operator to notify the department at least 10 days before a change in location of a stationary source permitted under this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993; am § 26 ch 46 SLA 2003)

Sec. 46.14.220.
Objection by federal administrator.

An operating permit may not be issued under this chapter until the federal administrator approves the permit, or until 45 days after a copy of the final draft permit has been provided by the department to the federal administrator, whichever is earlier. If, during the 45-day period, the federal administrator files an objection with the department, the department shall notify the applicant of the objection. The department may not issue the permit until the objection is resolved or the permit is revised to meet the objection of the federal administrator. Upon request of an applicant, the department shall assist the applicant in an effort to resolve promptly an objection by the federal administrator.

Within 60 days after the close of the 45-day period under (a) of this section and in accordance with procedures established in federal regulations adopted under 42 U.S.C. 7661d(b)(2) (Clean Air Act, sec. 505(b)(2)), a person may petition the federal administrator to file an objection to the permit.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993)

Administrative Code. —

For major stationary source permits, see 18 AAC 50, art. 3.

Sec. 46.14.230.
Duration of operating permits.

An operating permit under this chapter, including an operating permit that contains a compliance schedule, shall be issued for a fixed term of five years after the date of issue, except as provided for temporary operations under AS

46.14.215

or unless a shorter term is requested by the permit applicant.

If a timely and complete application for renewal of an operating permit is submitted to the department, the existing permit issued under this chapter does not expire until the renewal permit has been issued or denied.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993)

Administrative Code. —

For major stationary source permits, see 18 AAC 50, art. 3.

Sec. 46.14.235.
Federal termination, modification, or revocation and reissuance of permits.

The department shall take measures practicable and otherwise lawful to avoid termination, modification, or revocation and reissuance by the federal administrator of permits issued by the department under this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993)

Sec. 46.14.240.
Permit administration fees.

The owner or operator of a stationary source who is required to apply for a permit under AS

46.14.130

shall pay to the department all assessed permit administration fees established under (b) of this section except that the person named in a permit issued under AS

46.14.170

shall pay assessed permit administration fees incurred after the date the permit is issued.

The department shall establish by regulation permit administration fees in accordance with AS

37.10.050

—

37.10.058

.

[Repealed, §§ 60(b), 65 ch 46 SLA 2003.]

Costs incurred by the department and other state or local governmental agencies that are assessed against small business facilities that qualify for assistance under AS

46.14.300

—

46.14.310

shall be recovered from emission fees under AS

46.14.250(h)(2)

for the following services:

providing preapplication consultation, assistance, and completeness review of applications for a permit, an amendment, a permit modification, or a renewal of a permit;

reviewing or assisting in the preparation of specific documents to support a permit for a stationary source; the documents described in this paragraph include on-site evaluations.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993; am §§ 27 — 30, 60(b) ch 46 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For program administration, see 18 AAC 50, art. 2.

For user fees, see 18 AAC 50, art. 4.

Sec. 46.14.250.
Emission fees.

A person named as permittee in a permit issued under this chapter shall pay to the department all assessed emission fees established under this section.

The department shall establish by regulation an emission fee rate. The rate shall be set on the basis of dollars per ton of air pollutant emitted. The department shall assess emission fees annually on or before July 1 based on a stationary source’s estimated assessable emissions for the subsequent fiscal year. The department may allow installment payments of assessed emission fees.

For a stationary source that begins operation during a fiscal year, the department shall prorate the first year’s fee to cover the time period occurring before the next annual payment date. The owner or operator shall pay the initial emission fee upon commencement of lawful stationary source operation unless authorized to pay by installments under (b) of this section. The first year’s emission fee may not duplicate a fee paid by a permittee under AS

44.46.025

for the same emissions units for the same time period. If the fees would otherwise be duplicative, the department shall provide a credit toward the emission fee in the amount of the unused balance of the fee collected under AS

44.46.025

. The unused balance to be credited shall be based on prorating the total original fee under AS 44.46.025 for the time period for which an emission fee applies.

The department shall design the emission fee rate to distribute the total annual incurred costs described under (h) of this section in a manner so that each permittee is assessed an annual emission fee that reflects an equitable apportionment of the fees paid by each stationary source type, size, or category. In making an apportionment under (f)(6) of this section, the department shall consider factors such as exemptions or reduced rates for small amounts of emissions, limits upon assessable emissions, exempting small business facilities from the costs of the small business assistance program established under AS

46.14.300

, air pollution prevention efforts, and other factors that may ensure fair distribution of the costs described under (h) of this section.

[Repealed, § 88 ch 56 SLA 2005.]

The department shall set the emission fee rate in regulation to implement the policy established in (d) of this section. The department shall base the regulation on the findings of a report, which the department shall make available to the public with proper notice before adoption of the regulation, that examines

fees assessed;

alternative fee rates or formulas;

types, sizes, or categories of stationary sources, their respective emission quantities, and their previous or proposed fee burden;

apparent inequities encountered in the initial fee rate;

total costs incurred or anticipated to be incurred under (h) of this section; and

other factors that ensure fair distribution of the costs described in (h) of this section.

The department shall periodically, and at least every four years, evaluate the fee rate set under this section to determine if it is responsive to the policy established in (d) of this section and shall provide its findings in a report.

In this section,

“assessable emission” means the quantity of each air pollutant for which emission fees are assessed and is the lesser of

the stationary source’s potential to emit, in tons per year, each air pollutant; or

the projected annual rate of emissions, in tons per year, of each air pollutant by the stationary source based upon previous actual annual emissions if the permittee can demonstrate to the department its previous actual annual rate of emissions through monitoring, modeling, calculations, or other method acceptable to the department;

“emission fees” mean fees assessed to recover costs incurred by the department and other state or local governmental agencies for the implementation of minor permits, for the implementation of construction permits, and for operating permits to the extent required under 42 U.S.C. 7661a(b)(3)(A) and federal regulations implementing that provision, for execution of the permit program established under this chapter that are generally not associated with service provided to a specific facility, including the costs incurred by the department or a local air quality program to comply with AS

46.14.010

and

46.14.015

; the costs may include rent, utilities, permit program management, administrative and accounting services, and other costs as identified by the department in regulations; the fees shall also be sufficient to recover the cost of the small business assistance program under AS

46.14.300

—

46.14.310

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993; am §§ 31, 32 ch 46 SLA 2003; am §§ 73, 74, 88 ch 56 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For major stationary source permits, see 18 AAC 50, art. 3.

For user fees, see 18 AAC 50, art. 4.

Sec. 46.14.255.
Interest and sanctions for nonpayment.

The department may assess interest against the owner and operator after a fee is due under this chapter and is unpaid. Interest assessed under this subsection shall be computed at two percentage points higher than the prime rate, as defined in AS

44.88.599

, for the day the fee was due.

If a permittee has failed to pay a fee imposed under AS

46.14.240

—

46.14.250

, a penalty, assessment, or damage award imposed under AS

46.03.760(e)

or

46.03.790

for a violation of this chapter, or interest imposed under (a) of this section, the department may, after 30 days’ written notice to the permittee, revoke a minor permit, refuse to issue or renew permits requested by the permittee, or refuse to amend or modify a permit when the amendment or modification is requested by the permittee.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993; am § 4 ch 33 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1995, in subsection (b), “AS

46.03.760

(e)” was substituted for “AS

46.03.760(f)

” to reflect the 1995 reorganization of AS

46.03.760

.

Administrative Code. —

For user fees, see 18 AAC 50, art. 4.

Sec. 46.14.260.
Clean air protection fund.

The clean air protection fund is established. The fund consists of fees collected by the department under AS

46.14.240

and

46.14.250

and under regulations authorized by AS

46.14.140

, as required by 42 U.S.C. 7661a(b)(3)(C)(iii) (Clean Air Act, sec. 502(b)(3)(C)(iii)) for state participation in the federal emission control permit program.

The money deposited into the clean air protection fund may only be used to cover the reasonable direct and indirect costs required to support the permit program under this chapter and the activities of the small business assistance program that are directed at stationary sources subject to this chapter, not including court costs or other costs associated with an enforcement action.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993; am § 33 ch 46 SLA 2003)

Sec. 46.14.265.
Emission control permit receipts account.

The emission control permit receipts account is established in the state treasury. Under AS

37.05.146(c)

, money received by the department in payment of fees under AS

46.14.240

and

46.14.250

and under regulations adopted under AS

46.14.140

, other than fees described in AS

46.14.260(a)

, shall be deposited in the account. Appropriations from the account are not made from the unrestricted general fund.

Nothing in this section creates a dedicated fund.

History.

(§ 34 ch 46 SLA 2003)

Sec. 46.14.270.
Clean air protection account.

Civil or criminal penalties, fines, assessments, or damages, and interest, attorney fees, and costs collected as a result of a violation relating to this chapter and interest collected under AS

46.14.255

shall be deposited in the general fund and credited to a special account called the “clean air protection account.”

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993)

Sec. 46.14.275.
Timely and complete application as shield.

If an owner and operator have submitted a timely and complete application for a permit or a permit renewal, as applicable, but final action has not been taken on the application, the owner’s and operator’s failure to have an operating permit is not a violation of this chapter unless the delay in final action was due to the failure of the owner and operator to submit, in a timely manner, additional information required or requested to process the application. An owner and operator required to have an operating permit under this chapter are not in violation of the operating permit program established under this chapter before the date on which the owner and operator are required to submit an application under AS

46.14.150

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993)

Sec. 46.14.280.
Termination, modification, reopening, or revocation and reissuance of permits by the department.

After 30 days’ written notice to the permittee, the department

may terminate, modify, or revoke and reissue a construction, operating, or minor permit if the department finds that

the permit was obtained by misrepresentation of material fact or by failure of the owner and operator to disclose fully the facts relating to issuance of the permit;

the permittee has violated this chapter, a regulation, a judicial or administrative order, or a material term or condition of a permit, approval, or acceptance issued under this chapter; or

the permittee has failed to construct or modify a stationary source within the time period specified in a construction permit, if any, required under AS

46.14.130(a)

;

may modify, or revoke and reissue a construction, operating, or minor permit if the department finds that

the permit contains a material mistake; or

there has been a material change in the quantity or type of air pollutant emitted from the stationary source; or

shall reopen a permit issued under this chapter

based on a determination of the federal administrator or the department that the permit must be revised to comply with 42 U.S.C. 7401 — 7671q (Clean Air Act) and regulations adopted under 42 U.S.C. 7401 — 7671q; or

to incorporate changes in law, or to impose equivalent emission limitations, that become applicable after the permit is issued if the permit is issued to a major source and has a remaining duration of three or more years; the department shall make revisions allowed under this subparagraph as soon as practicable, but, regarding a change in law, not later than 18 months after the change in law takes effect; the department may not reopen the permit of a major source under this subparagraph if the change in law is not effective until after the date that the permit expires.

Reopening of a permit under (a)(3) of this section shall be treated as a permit renewal by the department if the procedural requirements for permit renewal have been met.

Proceedings to reopen a permit under this section shall follow the same procedure as for initial permit issuance and shall affect only those parts of the permit for which the department had cause to reopen under this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993; am § 35 ch 46 SLA 2003; am § 5 ch 33 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1993, in (a)(3)(B) of this section, “limitations” was substituted for “limitation” to correct a clerical error.

Administrative Code. —

For major stationary source permits, see 18 AAC 50, art. 3.

Sec. 46.14.285.
Amendment and modification of permit upon request of permittee.

A permittee may request

a permit amendment that provides for administrative changes to a permit that do not result in material changes in permit terms or conditions, such as changes in the name of the owner or operator, mailing address, registered agent, or assessable emissions;

an expedited authorization for minor changes in permit terms and conditions that provide for flexibility in the operation of a stationary source consistent with 42 U.S.C. 7661a(b)(10) (Clean Air Act, sec. 502(b)(10)), and regulations adopted under that paragraph; the department may adopt regulations that include procedures under which the public may participate when an expedited authorization is requested under this paragraph; or

a modification of a permit to authorize significant changes in permit terms and conditions consistent with this chapter and regulations adopted under AS

46.14.140

.

The department shall review all requests submitted under (a) of this section and issue or deny the permit amendment or modification or otherwise authorize or deny the request consistent with this chapter and regulations adopted under this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993; am § 36 ch 46 SLA 2003)

Sec. 46.14.290.
Permit as shield.

To the extent allowed under 42 U.S.C. 7661c(f) (Clean Air Act, sec. 504(f)), a permittee is considered in compliance with applicable requirements of this chapter, regulations adopted under this chapter and 42 U.S.C. 7401 — 7671q (Clean Air Act) and regulations adopted under it, if

the applicable requirements are included and specifically identified in the owner or operator’s permit; or

the requirements are determined in writing not to be applicable to the permitted stationary source; a determination made under this paragraph shall be included in the permit.

This section does not alter or affect

the owner’s and operator’s obligation to comply with an emergency order issued under AS

46.03.820

or 42 U.S.C. 7603 (Clean Air Act, sec. 303);

the liability of an owner and operator for a violation of applicable requirements of law before or at the time of permit issuance; or

the ability of the department to obtain information from an owner or operator of a stationary source under AS

46.14.020(b)

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993; am § 37 ch 46 SLA 2003)